Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4402
Terms, defined.

As used in the Nebraska Right to Farm Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Farm or farm operation means any tract of land over ten acres in area used for or devoted to the commercial production of farm products;

(2) Farm product means those plants and animals useful to man and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops, grains and feed crops, dairy and dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock, including breeding and grazing, fruits, vegetables, flowers, seeds, grasses, trees, fish, apiaries, equine and other similar products, or any other product which incorporates the use of food, feed, fiber, or fur; and

(3) Public grain warehouse or public grain warehouse operation means any grain elevator building or receptacle in which grain is held for longer than ten days and includes, but is not limited to, all buildings, elevators, and warehouses consisting of one or more warehouse sections within the confines of a city, township, county, or state that are considered a single delivery point with the capability to receive, load out, weigh, and store grain.

Laws 1982, LB 668, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1193, § 6.